Florida, session 2026, HB1289.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
13
14 Section 1. Paragraph (h) of subsection (2), subsection
15 (3), and paragraph (d) of subsection (8) of section 121.0515,
16 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
17 121.0515 Special Risk Class.—
18 (2) MEMBERSHIP.—
19 (h) Effective August 1, 2008, "special risk member"
20 includes any member who meets the special criteria for continued
21 membership set forth in paragraph (3)(k) (3)(j).
22 (3) CRITERIA.—A member, to be designated as a special risk
23 member, must meet the following criteria:
24 (a) Effective October 1, 1978, the member must be employed
25 as a law enforcement officer and be certified, or required to be
Page 1 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1289-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1289 2026
26 certified, in compliance with s. 943.1395, except that; however,
27 sheriffs and elected police chiefs are not required to be
28 certified excluded from meeting the certification requirements
29 of this paragraph. In addition, the member's duties and
30 responsibilities must include the pursuit, apprehension, and
31 arrest of law violators or suspected law violators; or as of
32 July 1, 1982, the member must be an active member of a bomb
33 disposal unit whose primary responsibility is the location,
34 handling, and disposal of explosive devices; or the member must
35 be the supervisor or command officer of a member or members who
36 have such responsibilities. Administrative support personnel,
37 including, but not limited to, those whose primary duties and
38 responsibilities are in accounting, purchasing, legal, and
39 personnel, are not included;
40 (b) Effective October 1, 1978, the member must be employed
41 as a firefighter and be certified, or required to be certified,
42 in compliance with s. 633.408 and be employed solely within the
43 fire department of a local government employer or an agency of
44 state government with firefighting responsibilities. In
45 addition, the member's duties and responsibilities must include
46 on-the-scene fighting of fires; as of October 1, 2001, fire
47 prevention or firefighter training; as of October 1, 2001,
48 direct supervision of firefighting units, fire prevention, or
49 firefighter training; or as of July 1, 2001, aerial firefighting
50 surveillance performed by fixed-wing aircraft pilots employed by
Page 2 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1289-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1289 2026
51 the Florida Forest Service of the Department of Agriculture and
52 Consumer Services; or the member must be the supervisor or
53 command officer of a member or members who have such
54 responsibilities. Administrative support personnel, including,
55 but not limited to, those whose primary duties and
56 responsibilities are in accounting, purchasing, legal, and
57 personnel, are not included. All periods of creditable service
58 in fire prevention or firefighter training, or as the supervisor
59 or command officer of a member or members who have such
60 responsibilities, and for which the employer paid the special
61 risk contribution rate, are included;
62 (c) Effective October 1, 1978, the member must be employed
63 as a correctional officer and be certified, or required to be
64 certified, in compliance with s. 943.1395. In addition, the
65 member's primary duties and responsibilities must be the
66 custody, and physical restraint if when necessary, of prisoners
67 or inmates within a prison, jail, or other criminal detention
68 facility, or while on work detail outside the facility, or while
69 being transported; or as of July 1, 1984, the member must be the
70 supervisor or command officer of a member or members who have
71 such responsibilities. Administrative support personnel,
72 including, but not limited to, those whose primary duties and
73 responsibilities are in accounting, purchasing, legal, and
74 personnel, are not included; however, wardens and assistant
75 wardens, as defined by rule, are included;
Page 3 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1289-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1289 2026
76 (d) Effective October 1, 1999, the member must be employed
77 by a licensed Advance Life Support (ALS) or Basic Life Support
78 (BLS) employer as an emergency medical technician or a paramedic
79 and be certified in compliance with s. 401.27. In addition, the
80 member's primary duties and responsibilities must include on-
81 the-scene emergency medical care or as of October 1, 2001,
82 direct supervision of emergency medical technicians or
83 paramedics, or the member must be the supervisor or command
84 officer of one or more members who have such responsibility.
85 Administrative support personnel, including, but not limited to,
86 those whose primary responsibilities are in accounting,
87 purchasing, legal, and personnel, are not included;
88 (e) Effective January 1, 2001, the member must be employed
89 as a community-based correctional probation officer and be
90 certified, or required to be certified, in compliance with s.
91 943.1395. In addition, the member's primary duties and
92 responsibilities must be the supervised custody, surveillance,
93 control, investigation, and counseling of assigned inmates,
94 probationers, parolees, or community controllees within the
95 community; or the member must be the supervisor of a member or
96 members who have such responsibilities. Administrative support
97 personnel, including, but not limited to, those whose primary
98 duties and responsibilities are in accounting, purchasing, legal
99 services, and personnel management, are not included; however,
100 probation and parole circuit and deputy circuit administrators
Page 4 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1289-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1289 2026
101 are included;
102 (f) Effective January 1, 2001, the member must be employed
103 in one of the following classes and must spend at least 75
104 percent of his or her time performing duties that which involve
105 contact with patients or inmates in a correctional or forensic
106 facility or institution:
107 1. Dietitian (class codes 5203 and 5204);
108 2. Public health nutrition consultant (class code 5224);
109 3. Psychological specialist (class codes 5230 and 5231);
110 4. Psychologist (class code 5234);
111 5. Senior psychologist (class codes 5237 and 5238);
112 6. Regional mental health consultant (class code 5240);
113 7. Psychological Services Director—DCF (class code 5242);
114 8. Pharmacist (class codes 5245 and 5246);
115 9. Senior pharmacist (class codes 5248 and 5249);
116 10. Dentist (class code 5266);
117 11. Senior dentist (class code 5269);
118 12. Registered nurse (class codes 5290 and 5291);
119 13. Senior registered nurse (class codes 5292 and 5293);
120 14. Registered nurse specialist (class codes 5294 and
121 5295);
122 15. Clinical associate (class codes 5298 and 5299);
123 16. Advanced practice registered nurse (class codes 5297
124 and 5300);
125 17. Advanced practice registered nurse specialist (class
Page 5 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1289-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1289 2026
126 codes 5304 and 5305);
127 18. Registered nurse supervisor (class codes 5306 and
128 5307);
129 19. Senior registered nurse supervisor (class codes 5308
130 and 5309);
131 20. Registered nursing consultant (class codes 5312 and
132 5313);
133 21. Quality management program supervisor (class code
134 5314);
135 22. Executive nursing director (class codes 5320 and
136 5321);
137 23. Speech and hearing therapist (class code 5406); or
138 24. Pharmacy manager (class code 5251);
139 (g) Effective October 1, 2005, through June 30, 2008, the
140 member must be employed by a law enforcement agency or medical
141 examiner's office in a forensic discipline recognized by the
142 International Association for Identification and must qualify
143 for active membership in the International Association for
144 Identification. The member's primary duties and responsibilities
145 must include the collection, examination, preservation,
146 documentation, preparation, or analysis of physical evidence or
147 testimony, or both, or the member must be the direct supervisor,
148 quality management supervisor, or command officer of one or more
149 individuals with such responsibility. Administrative support
150 personnel, including, but not limited to, those whose primary
Page 6 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1289-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1289 2026
151 responsibilities are clerical or in accounting, purchasing,
152 legal, and personnel, are not included;
153 (h) Effective July 1, 2008, the member must be employed by
154 the Department of Law Enforcement in the crime laboratory or by
155 the Department of Financial Services in the forensic laboratory
156 in one of the following classes:
157 1. Forensic technologist (class code 8459);
158 2. Crime laboratory technician (class code 8461);
159 3. Crime laboratory analyst (class code 8463);
160 4. Senior crime laboratory analyst (class code 8464);
161 5. Crime laboratory analyst supervisor (class code 8466);
162 6. Forensic chief (class code 9602); or
163 7. Forensic services quality manager (class code 9603);
164 (i) Effective July 1, 2008, the member must be employed by
165 a local government law enforcement agency or medical examiner's
166 office and must spend at least 65 percent of his or her time
167 performing duties that involve the collection, examination,
168 preservation, documentation, preparation, or analysis of human
169 tissues or fluids or physical evidence having potential
170 biological, chemical, or radiological hazard or contamination,
171 or use chemicals, processes, or materials that may have
172 carcinogenic or health-damaging properties in the analysis of
173 such evidence, or the member must be the direct supervisor of
174 one or more individuals having such responsibility. If a special
175 risk member changes to another position within the same agency,
Page 7 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1289-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1289 2026
176 he or she must submit a complete application as provided in
177 paragraph (4)(a); or
178 (j) Effective July 1, 2026, the member must be employed as
179 a state attorney as defined in s. 542.17(7), the statewide
180 prosecutor as described in s. 16.56, an assistant statewide
181 prosecutor as designated under s. 16.56(3), or a special
182 investigator as defined in s. 27.251. The number of creditable
183 years for full retirement eligibility for such member shall be
184 30 years without penalty; or
185 (k) The member must have already qualified for and be
186 actively participating in special risk membership under
187 paragraph (a), paragraph (b), or paragraph (c), must have
188 suffered a qualifying injury as defined in this paragraph, must
189 not be receiving disability retirement benefits as provided in
190 s. 121.091(4), and must satisfy the requirements of this
191 paragraph.
192 1. The ability to qualify for the class of membership
193 defined in paragraph (2)(h) occurs when two licensed medical
194 physicians, one of whom is a primary treating physician of the
195 member, certify the existence of the physical injury and medical
196 condition that constitute a qualifying injury as defined in this
197 paragraph and that the member has reached maximum medical
198 improvement after August 1, 2008. The certifications from the
199 licensed medical physicians must include, at a minimum, that the
200 injury to the special risk member has resulted in a physical
Page 8 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1289-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1289 2026
201 loss, or loss of use, of at least two of the following: left
202 arm, right arm, left leg, or right leg; and that:
203 a. The That this physical loss or loss of use is total and
204 permanent, except if the loss of use is due to a physical injury
205 to the member's brain, in which event the loss of use is
206 permanent with at least 75 percent loss of motor function with
207 respect to each arm or leg affected.
208 b. The That this physical loss or loss of use renders the
209 member physically unable to perform the essential job functions
210 of his or her special risk position.
211 c. That, Notwithstanding the this physical loss or loss of
212 use, the individual can perform the essential job functions
213 required by the member's new position, as provided in
214 subparagraph 3.
215 d. That Use of artificial limbs is not possible or does
216 not alter the member's ability to perform the essential job
217 functions of the member's position.
218 e. That The physical loss or loss of use is a direct
219 result of a physical injury and not a result of any mental,
220 psychological, or emotional injury.
221 2. For the purposes of this paragraph, the term
222 "qualifying injury" means an injury sustained in the line of
223 duty, as certified by the member's employing agency, by a
224 special risk member that does not result in total and permanent
225 disability as defined in s. 121.091(4)(b). An injury is a
Page 9 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1289-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1289 2026
226 qualifying injury if the injury is a physical injury to the
227 member's physical body resulting in a physical loss, or loss of
228 use, of at least two of the following: left arm, right arm, left
229 leg, or right leg. Notwithstanding any other provision of this
230 section, an injury that would otherwise qualify as a qualifying
231 injury is not considered a qualifying injury if and when the
232 member ceases employment with the employer for whom he or she
233 was providing special risk services on the date the injury
234 occurred.
235 3. The new position, as described in sub-subparagraph
236 1.c., which that is required for qualification as a special risk
237 member under this paragraph is not required to be a position
238 with essential job functions that entitle an individual to
239 special risk membership. Whether a new position as described in
240 sub-subparagraph 1.c. exists and is available to the special
241 risk member is a decision to be made solely by the employer in
242 accordance with its hiring practices and applicable law.
243 4. This paragraph does not grant or create additional
244 rights for any individual to continued employment or to be hired
245 or rehired by his or her employer which that are not already
246 provided within the Florida Statutes, the State Constitution,
247 the Americans with Disabilities Act, if applicable, or any other
248 applicable state or federal law.
249 (8) SPECIAL RISK ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT CLASS.—
250 (d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this
Page 10 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1289-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1289 2026
251 subsection, this subsection does not apply to any special risk
252 member who qualifies for continued membership pursuant to
253 paragraph (3)(k) (3)(j).
254 Section 2. Paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section
255 121.052, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
256 121.052 Membership class of elected officers.—
257 (2) MEMBERSHIP.—The following holders of elective office,
258 hereinafter referred to as "elected officers," whether assuming
259 elective office by election, reelection, or appointment, are
260 members of the Elected Officers' Class, except as provided in
261 subsection (3):
262 (a) Any Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Cabinet officer,
263 legislator, Supreme Court justice, district court of appeal
264 judge, or circuit judge, or state attorney assuming office on or
265 after July 1, 1972.
266 Section 3. Paragraphs (h) and (k) of subsection (1) of
267 section 121.055, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
268 121.055 Senior Management Service Class.—There is hereby
269 established a separate class of membership within the Florida
270 Retirement System to be known as the "Senior Management Service
271 Class," which shall become effective February 1, 1987.
272 (1)
273 (h)1. Except as provided in subparagraph 3., effective
274 January 1, 1994, participation in the Senior Management Service
275 Class shall be compulsory for the State Courts Administrator and
Page 11 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1289-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1289 2026
276 the Deputy State Courts Administrators, the Clerk of the Supreme
277 Court, the Marshal of the Supreme Court, the Executive Director
278 of the Justice Administrative Commission, the capital collateral
279 regional counsel, the clerks of the district courts of appeals,
280 the marshals of the district courts of appeals, and the trial
281 court administrator and the Chief Deputy Court Administrator in
282 each judicial circuit. Effective January 1, 1994, additional
283 positions in the office offices of the state attorney and public
284 defender in each judicial circuit may be designated for
285 inclusion in the Senior Management Service Class of the Florida
286 Retirement System, provided that:
287 a. Positions to be included in the class shall be
288 designated by the state attorney or public defender, as
289 appropriate. Notice of intent to designate positions for
290 inclusion in the class shall be published for at least 2
291 consecutive weeks on a publicly accessible website as provided
292 in s. 50.0311 or, if published in print, once a week for 2
293 consecutive weeks in a newspaper qualified under chapter 50 in
294 the county or counties affected.
295 b. One nonelective full-time position may be designated
296 for each state attorney and public defender reporting to the
297 Department of Management Services; for agencies with 200 or more
298 regularly established positions under the state attorney or
299 public defender, additional nonelective full-time positions may
300 be designated, not to exceed 0.5 percent of the regularly
Page 12 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1289-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1289 2026
301 established positions within the agency.
302 c. Each position added to the class must be a managerial
303 or policymaking position filled by an employee who serves at the
304 pleasure of the state attorney or public defender without civil
305 service protection, and who:
306 (I) Heads an organizational unit; or
307 (II) Has responsibility to effect or recommend personnel,
308 budget, expenditure, or policy decisions in his or her areas of
309 responsibility.
310 2. Participation in this class shall be compulsory, except
311 as provided in subparagraph 3., for any judicial employee who
312 holds a position designated for coverage in the Senior
313 Management Service Class, and such participation shall continue
314 until the employee terminates employment in a covered position.
315 Effective January 1, 2001, participation in this class is
316 compulsory for assistant state attorneys, assistant statewide
317 prosecutors, assistant public defenders, and assistant capital
318 collateral regional counsel. Effective January 1, 2002,
319 participation in this class is compulsory for assistant
320 attorneys general.
321 3. In lieu of participation in the Senior Management
322 Service Class, such members, excluding assistant state
323 attorneys, assistant public defenders, assistant statewide
324 prosecutors, assistant attorneys general, and assistant capital
325 collateral regional counsel, may participate in the Senior
Page 13 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1289-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1289 2026
326 Management Service Optional Annuity Program as established in
327 subsection (6).
328 (k) Any state attorney or public defender in the Elected
329 Officers' Class who has creditable service as an assistant state
330 attorney or assistant public defender may upgrade retirement
331 credit for such service in accordance with the provisions of
332 paragraph (j).
333 Section 4. The Legislature finds that a proper and
334 legitimate state purpose is served when employees, officers, and
335 retirees of the state and its political subdivisions, and the
336 dependents, survivors, and beneficiaries of such employees,
337 officers, and retirees, are extended the basic protections
338 afforded by governmental retirement systems. These persons must
339 be provided benefits that are fair and adequate and that are
340 managed, administered, and funded in an actuarially sound manner
341 as required by s. 14, Article X of the State Constitution and
342 part VII of chapter 112, Florida Statutes. Therefore, the
343 Legislature determines and declares that this act fulfills an
344 important state interest.
345 Section 5. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 14 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1289-00